Utah statutes.
70C-8-107.   Temporary or injunctive relief against unconscionable and
fraudulent conduct.
(1)  The department may bring a civil action to enjoin a person subject to
this title from:
(a)  making or enforcing a term of consumer credit transactions that is
unconscionable;
(b)  engaging in fraudulent conduct in inducing consumers to enter into a
consumer credit transaction; or
(c)  engaging in conduct of the type specified in Subsection (1)(a) or (b)
with respect to a transaction that gives rise to or leads a person to believe
will give rise to a consumer credit transaction.
(2)  An action brought pursuant to this section is subject to the requirements
of Utah Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 65A.
